District of Columbia statutes.
44-151.18

Continuing Care Retirement Community Regulatory and Supervision Trust Account.

All fees, fines, penalties, and assessments received by the Commissioner under this chapter shall be deposited in, and credited to, the Continuing Care Retirement Community Regulatory and Supervision Trust Account established by § 31-1202(b-2) and expended in accordance with § 31-1202(b-2).

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-270, § 118, 52 DCR 799